Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-717
Commission; organization; officers.

The Commission on Judicial Qualifications shall annually select a vice-chairperson from its own members and a secretary who may or may not be a member of the commission and who shall keep minutes of all meetings of the commission. Such vice-chairperson and secretary shall each serve for one year or until a successor is selected.

Laws 1967, c. 141, § 3, p. 431;

Laws 1981, LB 475, § 3.